Maine, session 132, LD182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1708-A is enacted to read:
§1708-A. Reimbursement to Maine Veterans' Homes
Services provided by a veterans' facility must be reimbursed by the MaineCare program
at rates established by the department pursuant to this section. This section applies to all
funds, including federal funds, paid by an agency of the State to a veterans' facility for
resident care.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Multilevel health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 7852, subsection
10-A.
B. "Nursing home" has the same meaning as in section 1812-A.
C. "Residential care facility" has the same meaning as in section 7852, subsection 14.
D. "Veterans' facility" means a nursing home, residential care facility or multilevel
health care facility that is operated by the Maine Veterans' Homes at any location
required under Title 37-B, section 601, subsection 2.
2. Per resident basis. Veterans' facilities must be reimbursed on a per resident daily
rate basis for services to residents covered under the MaineCare program. Different rates
may be established for services equivalent to those provided by nursing homes, residential
care facilities and multilevel health care facilities.
3. Rate calculations. Rate calculations under this section must result in
reimbursement of the portion of the total MaineCare allowable cost of operating each
veterans' facility attributable to the provision of services to residents who receive
MaineCare benefits. Different rates may be established for services equivalent to those
provided by nursing homes, residential care facilities and multilevel health care facilities.
4. Annual adjustments for inflation. Rates established pursuant to this section must
be adjusted annually to reflect projected inflation for the year to which the rates will apply.
5. Other states' data; limitation. The department may use data from other states'
veterans' home programs and appropriate price indices to establish the rates required in this
section, as long as the application of data from other states' veterans' home programs and
price indices does not reduce reimbursement below the portion of the total MaineCare
allowable cost as described in subsection 3.
6. Use of 3rd party. The department may contract with a 3rd party to derive or review
the rates established under this section.